Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.185

Covenant homeownership program assessment.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1858.SL) ***

(1) Beginning January 1, 2024, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the county auditor must collect a covenant homeownership program assessment of $100 for each document recorded, which is in addition to any other charge, surcharge, or assessment allowed by law. The county auditor may retain up to one percent of the moneys for collection of the assessment and must remit the remainder of the moneys to the state treasurer to be deposited in the covenant homeownership account created in RCW 43.181.020.

(2) The assessment imposed in this section does not apply to: (a) Assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust; (b) documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death; (c) any recorded documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee or additional assessments under state law; (d) marriage licenses issued by the county auditor; (e) documents recording a name change order under RCW 4.24.130; or (f) documents recording a federal, state, county, city, or water-sewer district, or wage lien or satisfaction of lien.

[2023 c 340 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—Conflict with federal requirements—2023 c 340: See notes following RCW 43.181.040.